Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.080

Conduct of elections.

The election of the members of the board of freeholders and that upon the proposition of adopting or rejecting the proposed charter and the officers to be elected thereunder, the returns of both elections, the canvassing thereof and the declaration of the result shall be governed by the laws regulating and controlling elections in the city.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.080. Prior: (i) 1890 p 216 s 3, part; RRS s 8953, part. (ii) 1890 p 223 s 6, part; RRS s 8977, part. (iii) 1890 p 217 s 4, part; RRS s 8954, part.]

NOTES:

Elections: Title 29A RCW.